Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-609 Licensing of producers.
(a) Fraternal benefit society producers shall be licensed in accordance with
the provisions governing producers in articles 7 and 9A of chapter 431, except
that the appointment shall be made by the fraternal benefit society. Fraternal
benefit society producers are not prohibited from obtaining additional licenses
provided for in article 9 of chapter 431. No examination shall be required of
an individual licensed to represent a fraternal benefit society prior to July 1,
1988.

(b) No examination or license shall be
required of any regular salaried officer, employee or member of a licensed
society who devotes substantially all of the officer's, employee's or member's
services to activities other than the solicitation of fraternal insurance
contracts from the public, and who receives for the solicitation of such
contracts no commission or other compensation directly dependent upon the
amount of business obtained.

(c) Any producer, representative, or member of
a society who devotes, or intends to devote, less than fifty per cent of one's
time to the solicitation and procurement of insurance contracts for such
society shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (a). Any person
who in the preceding calendar year has solicited and procured life insurance
contracts on behalf of any society in an amount of insurance in excess of
$50,000, or, in the case of any other kind or kinds of insurance which the
society might write, on the persons of more than twenty-five individuals and
who has received or will receive a commission or other compensation therefor,
shall be presumed to be devoting, or intending to devote, fifty per cent of the
person's time to the solicitation or procurement of insurance contracts for
such society. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 246, §4; am L 2001, c 216,
§27; am L 2002, c 155, §104; am L 2003, c 212, §123; am L 2006, c 154, §43]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next